Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5205
Family practice residency program; how funded.

The family practice residency program may be funded in part by grants provided by the Department of Health and Human Services or agencies of the federal government. If such grants are provided, the Legislature shall not provide funding for such program.

Laws 1975, LB 571, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 711;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 607.